ja: ペンインクの色: 黒; 青; 茶色; 緑; マルチカラー; オレンジ; ピンク; 紫; 赤; ターコイズ; その他
hu: Toll tinta színe: Fekete; Kék; Barna; Zöld; Többszínű; Narancssárga; Rózsaszín; Lila; Piros; Türkizkék; Egyéb
nb: Blekkfarge for penn: Svart; Blå; Brun; Grønn; Flerfarget; Oransje; Rosa; Lilla; Rød; Turkis; Annet
pl: Kolor tuszu długopisu: Czarny; Niebieski; Brązowy; Zielony; Wielokolorowy; Pomarańczowy; Różowy; Fioletowy; Czerwony; Turkusowy; Inne
fi: Kynän musteen väri: Musta; Sininen; Ruskea; Vihreä; Monivärinen; Oranssi; Vaaleanpunainen; Violetti; Punainen; Turkoosi; Muu
sv: Bläckfärg för penna: Svart; Blå; Brun; Grön; Flerfärgad; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Röd; Turkos; Övrigt
lt-LT: Rašalo spalva: Juoda; Mėlyna; Ruda; Žalia; Daugiaspalvis; Oranžinė; Rožinė; Violetinė; Raudona; Turkio; Kita
cs: Barva inkoustu pro pero: Černá; Modrá; Hnědá; Zelená; Vícebarevná; Oranžová; Růžová; Purpurová; Červená; Tyrkysová; Ostatní
pt-PT: tinta de caneta cor: Preto; Azul; Castanho; Verde; Multicolor; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Turquesa; Outra
tr: Kalem mürekkebi rengi: Siyah; Mavi; Kahverengi; Yeşil; Çok renkli; Turuncu; Pembe; Mor; Kırmızı; Turkuaz; Diğer
pt-BR: Caneta cor da tinta: Preto; Azul; Marrom; Verde; Multicolorido; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Turquesa; Outro
vi: Màu mực bút: Đen; Xanh dương; Nâu; Xanh lá cây; Nhiều màu; Cam; Hồng; Tím; Đỏ; Xanh ngọc; Khác
ro-RO: Culoare cerneală cu stilou: Negru; Albastru; Maro; Verde; Multicolor; Portocaliu; Roz; Mov; Roșu; Turcoaz; Altele
de: Tintenfarbe des Stifts: Schwarz; Blau; Braun; Grün; Mehrfarbig; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Rot; Türkis; Sonstige
bg-BG: Цвят на мастилото за писалка: Черен; Син; Кафяв; Зелен; Многоцветен; Оранжев; Розов; Лилав; Червен; Тюркоазен; Друг
ru: Цвет чернил ручки: Черный; Синий; Коричневый; Зеленый; Разноцветный; Оранжевый; Розовый; Фиолетовый; Красный; Бирюзовый; Другое
es: Color de la tinta del bolígrafo: Negro; Azul; Marrón; Verde; Multicolor; Naranja; Rosa; Morado; Rojo; Turquesa; Otro
sk-SK: Farba atramentu do pera: Čierna; Modrá; Hnedá; Zelená; Viacfarebná; Oranžová; Ružová; Fialová; Červená; Tyrkysová; Iné
th: สีหมึกปากกา: สีดำ; สีน้ำเงิน; สีน้ำตาล; สีเขียว; หลายสี; สีส้ม; สีชมพู; สีม่วง; สีแดง; สีเทอร์ควอยซ์; อื่นๆ
ko: 펜 잉크 색상: 검정색; 파란색; 갈색; 녹색; 다색; 주황색; 분홍색; 보라색; 빨간색; 청록색; 기타
zh-TW: 筆墨顏色: 黑色; 藍色; 棕色; 綠色; 多色; 橙色; 粉紅色; 紫色; 紅色; 綠松石色; 其他
it: Colore dell'inchiostro della penna: Nero; Blu; Marrone; Verde; Multicolore; Arancione; Rosa; Viola; Rosso; Turchese; Altro
zh-CN: 钢笔墨水颜色: 黑色; 蓝色; 棕色; 绿色; 多色; 橙色; 粉红色; 紫色; 红色; 绿松石色; 其他
da: Blækfarve til pennen: Sort; Blå; Brun; Grøn; Flerfarvet; Orange; Pink; Lilla; Rød; Turkis; Andet
el: Μελάνι στυλό χρώμα: Μαύρο; Μπλε; Καφέ; Πράσινο; Πολύχρωμο; Πορτοκαλί; Ροζ; Μωβ; Κόκκινο; Τυρκουάζ; Άλλο
nl: Peninkt kleur: Zwart; Blauw; Bruin; Groen; Meerkleurig; Oranje; Roze; Paars; Rood; Turquoise; Overig
fr: Couleur de l’encre du stylo: Noir; Bleu; Marron; Vert; Multicolore; Orange; Rose; Violet; Rouge; Turquoise; Autre
en: Pen ink color: Black; Blue; Brown; Green; Multicolor; Orange; Pink; Purple; Red; Turquoise; Other
hr-HR: Boja tinte za olovku: Crna; Plava; Smeđa; Zelena; Višebojna; Narančasta; Ružičasta; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Tirkizna; Ostalo
sl-SI: Barva črnila pisala: Črna; Modra; Rjava; Zelena; Večbarvna; Oranžna; Roza; Vijoličasta; Rdeča; Turkizna; Drugo